Hawaii, session 2026, HB1389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 92, H.D. 1 (2023), requested that the department of agriculture, department of land and natural resources, department of health, and city and county of Honolulu convene a working group to identify solutions to mitigate and control the significant increase in the population of feral chickens and roosters on Oahu and submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2024. The legislature further finds that the working group's report recommends that the legislature appropriate funding for initiatives related to feral animals. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for: (1)  The expansion of the city and county of Honolulu's feral chicken program; and (2)  The establishment of a statewide education campaign to provide the public with information on the feeding of feral animals. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as a grant-in-aid to the city and county of Honolulu for the expansion of the feral chicken program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of customer services of the city and county of Honolulu for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for a statewide education campaign to provide the public with information on the feeding of feral animals. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the vector control branch of the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________